Maryland, session 2026, HB0931.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–1401.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) (1) “Nursing home” means a facility that offers nonacute inpatient care to
patients suffering from a disease, chronic illness, condition, disability of advanced age, or
terminal disease requiring maximal nursing care without continuous hospital services and
who require medical services and nursing services rendered by or under the supervision of
a licensed nurse together with convalescent, restorative, or rehabilitative services.
(2) “Nursing home” does not mean a facility offering domiciliary care or
personal care as those terms are defined in § 19–301 of this title.
19–1411.
(a) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “MEDICAL DIRECTOR” MEANS THE PHYSICIAN DESIGNATED BY A
NURSING HOME TO OVERSEE MEDICAL CARE AND CLINICAL POLICIES AT THE
NURSING HOME IN ACCORDANCE WITH FEDERAL AND STATE LAWS AND
REGULATIONS.
(3) “MEDICAL DIRECTOR CERTIFICATION” MEANS:
(I) A CERTIFIED MEDICAL DIRECTOR (CMD) CERTIFICATION
ISSUED BY THE POST–ACUTE AND LONG–TERM CARE MEDICAL ASSOCIATION
(PALTMED); OR
(II) A CREDENTIAL EQUIVALENT TO A CMD CERTIFICATION
APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) (1) (I) Each nursing home shall designate a physician WHO MEETS
THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (C)(1) OF THIS SECTION to serve as medical
director.
(II) A PHYSICIAN MAY NOT BE A DESIGNATED MEDICAL
DIRECTOR AT MORE THAN TWO LICENSED NURSING HOMES.

HOUSE BILL 931 3
(2) The medical director is responsible for monitoring physician services at
the nursing home.
(3) The medical director shall report monthly to the quality assurance
committee on the quality of medical care at the nursing home.
(C) (1) TO QUALIFY TO BE DESIGNATED AS A MEDICAL DIRECTOR UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A PHYSICIAN MUST:
(I) HOLD A VALID MEDICAL DIRECTOR CERTIFICATION; OR
(II) BE MAKING ACTIVE PROGRESS TOWARD OBTAINING A
MEDICAL DIRECTOR CERTIFICATION.
(2) A PHYSICIAN DESIGNATED AS A MEDICAL DIRECTOR UNDER
SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION SHALL SUBMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT:
(I) A COPY OF THE PHYSICIAN’S MEDICAL DIRECTOR
CERTIFICATION; OR
(II) EVIDENCE SATISFACTORY TO THE DEPARTMENT OF ACTIVE
PROGRESS TOWARD OBTAINING A MEDICAL DIRECTOR CERTIFICATION.
(3) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, A
PHYSICIAN WHO WAS DESIGNATED AS A MEDICAL DIRECTOR ON OR BEFORE
SEPTEMBER 30, 2026, SHALL OBTAIN A MEDICAL DIRECTOR CERTIFICATION ON OR
BEFORE SEPTEMBER 30, 2028 2030.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT MAY GRANT A PHYSICIAN DESCRIBED
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH A TIME–LIMITED EXTENSION FOR
OBTAINING A MEDICAL DIRECTOR CERTIFICATION ON A SHOWING OF GOOD CAUSE,
AS DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN REGULATION.
[(b)] (D) The Secretary, in consultation with the Medical and Chirurgical
Faculty of Maryland, and representatives of the nursing home industry, shall:
(1) [Establish qualifications for the medical director of a nursing home or
anyone acting for the medical director in his or her absence;
(2)] Define the duties of the medical director; and
[(3)] (2) Adopt regulations for the attending physicians who treat
residents of nursing homes that will provide for physician accountability.

HOUSE BILL 931
(E) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH AND MAINTAIN A PUBLICLY
ACCESSIBLE ONLINE DIRECTORY OF NURSING HOME MEDICAL DIRECTORS IN THE
STATE THAT INCLUDES EACH EACH NURSING HOME SHALL PUBLISH ON THE
NURSING HOME’S WEBSITE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION FOR THE MEDICAL
DIRECTOR’S DIRECTOR OF THE NURSING HOME:
(I) (1) NAME;
(II) (2) PROFESSIONAL CREDENTIALS; AND
(III) (3) CERTIFICATION STATUS.
(2) EACH NURSING HOME LICENSED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SHALL
SUBMIT THE NAME OF THE DESIGNATED MEDICAL DIRECTOR TO THE DEPARTMENT
FOR INCLUSION IN THE DIRECTORY IN A MANNER AND ON THE SCHEDULE
DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(F) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION, INCLUDING REGULATIONS THAT ESTABLISH:
(1) THE EDUCATIONAL AND EXPERIENTIAL REQUIREMENTS FOR A
MEDICAL DIRECTOR CERTIFICATION THAT IS EQUIVALENT TO A CMD
CERTIFICATION; AND
(2) THE PROCESS FOR APPROVING A MEDICAL DIRECTOR
CERTIFICATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.